Idaho, session 2026, H0651.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 36-115, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
36-115. NONEXPENDABLE BIG GAME DEPREDATION FUND -- EXPENDABLE BIG
GAME DEPREDATION FUND. (a) The nonexpendable big game depredation fund
is hereby established in the state treasury. On July 1, 2005, the state
controller shall transfer two million two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($2,250,000) from the big game secondary depredation account, created pur-
suant to section 3, chapter 370, laws of 1990, to the nonexpendable big game
depredation fund. Moneys in the fund shall be invested as provided in sec-
tion 67-1210, Idaho Code, and interest earned on investment of idle moneys
in the fund shall be paid to the expendable big game depredation fund. The
principal amount in the fund shall not be appropriated, but only the interest
earned on investment of the moneys in the fund shall be available for appro-
priation to the expendable big game depredation fund.
(b) The big game secondary depredation account was created in the state
treasury pursuant to section 3, chapter 370, laws of 1990, and shall, from
the date of enactment of this act, be known and referred to as the expendable
big game depredation fund. In addition to payments to the fund from the
nonexpendable big game depredation fund as provided for in subsection (a)
of this section and from the set-aside account as provided for in section
36-111(f), Idaho Code, the state controller shall annually, as soon after
July 1 of each year as practical, transfer into the fund two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000) from the fish and game account. Moneys in the fund are
subject to appropriation for the purposes recited in section 36-122, Idaho
Code, section 36-1108(a)3., Idaho Code, section 36-1108(b), Idaho Code,
section 36-1109 and section 36-1110, Idaho Code. Moneys in the fund shall be
invested as provided in section 67-1210, Idaho Code, and interest earned on
investment of idle moneys in the fund shall be paid to the fund. The expend-
able big game depredation fund shall be under the administrative direction
of the state controller.
(c) The state controller shall annually report to the legislature, the
division of financial management, the director of the department of agricul-
ture and the director of the department of fish and game the amount of inter-
est earnings and the availability of moneys in the expendable big game depre-
dation fund for appropriation. At the close of each fiscal year, any unex-
pended and unencumbered balance that exceeds two million five hundred thou-
sand dollars ($2,500,000), shall be transferred to the fish and game set-


aside account to be earmarked for control of depredation of private prop-
erty by pronghorn antelope, elk and deer and control of predators affect-
ing pronghorn antelope, elk and deer established pursuant to section 36-111,
Idaho Code. Transferred funds to the set-aside account shall be spent pur-
suant to the respective appropriation for the set-aside account.
(d) Any payment for damages pursuant to section 36-1108(b), Idaho Code,
is limited by the following conditions and requirements:
1. The full amount of any approved claim will not be paid at the time of
approval, but shall be subject to the following conditions and require-
ments:
(A) The director of the department of fish and game may order not
more than one-half (1/2) of the amount of the approved claim that
is to be paid from the expendable big game depredation fund to be
paid immediately, if, in the judgment of the director, such pay-
ment is within the estimated total claims liability for that fis-
cal year from the expendable big game depredation fund.
(B) The total payment amount to any person for approved claims
in the aggregate in a fiscal year, including any payment to any
pass-through entity as defined in chapter 30, title 63, Idaho
Code, from which the person receives income, and to any household
member, shall not exceed one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000).
(C) The balance of all unpaid approved claim amounts, including
claims submitted under the provisions of sections 36-1109 and
36-1110, Idaho Code adjusted to account for the one hundred
twenty-five thousand dollar ($125,000) limitation, shall be accu-
mulated to a total as of June 30. If the balance in the expendable
big game depredation fund appropriation is sufficient to pay
the balance of all such approved and adjusted claims, the direc-
tor shall pay them. If the balance is not sufficient to pay all
approved such claims, the director shall authorize a proportion-
ate amount to be paid to each claimant.
(D) Moneys remaining in the fund after payment is made to approved
and adjusted claims shall be used by the director to pay the re-
mainder of the approved claims that remains unpaid because of the
limitation required by this subsection. Such unpaid, approved
claim amounts shall be totaled with the unpaid claim amounts from
subsection (e) of this section. If moneys remaining in the fund
are sufficient to pay the remainder of all such unpaid, approved
claims, the director shall pay them. If the moneys are not suf-
ficient to pay the remainder of such claims, the director shall
authorize a proportionate amount to be paid to each claimant.
(D) (E) The director shall encumber the balance of moneys appro-
priated from the expendable big game depredation fund, or moneys
sufficient to pay the approved claims, whichever is the lesser.
2. Each claimant must submit a statement of total damages sustained per
occurrence. For each such statement, the following conditions and re-
quirements apply:
(A) The amount of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) must be de-
ducted from each such statement. This deductible is a net loss to


the owner or lessee, and will not be compensated for from the ex-
pendable big game depredation fund, but the owner or lessee is re-
quired to absorb only a single seven hundred fifty dollar ($750)
deductible per claim.
(B) Provided however, that for claims in subsequent years for dam-
age to standing or stored crops in the same location as the first
occurrence, the seven hundred fifty dollar ($750) deductible will
be waived if the department failed to prevent property loss fol-
lowing the first occurrence.
3. Each approved claim must contain a certification by the director of
the department of fish and game, or his designee, that:
(A) All statutory requirements leading up to approval for payment
have been met.
(B) The claimant has certified that he will accept the amount ap-
proved as payment in full for the claim submitted, subject to the
conditions and requirements of this subsection.
(e) Any claim for damages pursuant to section 36-1109, Idaho Code, is
limited by the following conditions and requirements:
1. The full amount of any approved claim will not be paid at the time of
approval, but shall be subject to the following conditions and require-
ments:
(A) The director of the department of fish and game may order that
not more than one-half (1/2) of the amount of the approved claim to
be paid immediately, if, in the judgment of the director, such pay-
ment is within the estimated total claims liability for that fis-
cal year from the expendable big game depredation fund.
(B) The total payment amount to any person for approved claims
in the aggregate in a fiscal year, including any payment to any
pass-through entity as defined in chapter 30, title 63, Idaho
Code, from which the person receives income, and to any household
member, shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the original expend-
able big game depredation fund appropriation for the fiscal year.
(C) The balance of all unpaid approved claim amounts, adjusted to
account for the ten percent (10%) limitation, shall be accumulated
to a total as of June 30. If the balance in the expendable big game
depredation fund appropriation is sufficient to pay all such ap-
proved and adjusted claims, the director shall promptly pay them.
If the balance is not sufficient to pay the balance of all approved
such claims, the director shall pay a proportionate share to each
claimant.
(D) Moneys remaining in the fund after payment is made to approved
and adjusted claims shall be used by the director to pay the re-
mainder of the approved claims that remains unpaid because of the
limitation required by this subsection. Such unpaid, approved
claim amounts shall be totaled with the unpaid claim amounts from
subsection (d) of this section. If moneys remaining in the fund
are sufficient to pay the remainder of all such unpaid, approved
claims, the director shall pay them. If the moneys are not suf-
ficient to pay the remainder of such claims, the director shall
authorize a proportionate amount to be paid to each claimant.


(D) (E) The director shall encumber the balance of the appropri-
ation, or moneys sufficient to pay the approved claims, whichever
is the lesser.
2. Each claimant must submit a statement of total damages sustained per
occurrence. For each such statement, the following condition applies:
the amount of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) must be deducted from
each such statement. Provided however, if an owner or caretaker suffers
damage to or destruction of livestock in more than one (1) occurrence
during the fiscal year, then only one (1) deductible must be subtracted
from the claims and the deductible on subsequent claims will be waived.
This deductible is a net loss to the owner or caretaker, and will not be
compensated for from the expendable big game depredation fund.
3. Each approved claim must contain a certification by the director of
the department of fish and game, or his designee, that:
(A) All statutory requirements leading up to approval for payment
have been met.
(B) The claimant has certified that he will accept the amount ap-
proved as payment in full for the claim submitted, subject to the
conditions and requirements of this subsection.
(f) Any claim for damages to forage pursuant to section 36-1110, Idaho
Code, is limited by the following conditions and requirements:
1. The full amount of any approved claim will not be paid at the time of
approval, but shall be subject to the following conditions and require-
ments:
(A) The director of the department of fish and game may order not
more than one-half (1/2) of the amount of the approved claim to be
paid immediately, if, in the judgment of the director, such pay-
ment is within the estimated total claims liability for that fis-
cal year from the expendable big game depredation fund.
(B) The balance of all unpaid approved claim amounts shall be ac-
cumulated to a total as of June 30. If the balance in the expend-
able big game depredation fund appropriation is sufficient to pay
all approved claims, the director shall pay them. If the balance
is not sufficient to pay all approved claims, the director shall
authorize a proportionate amount to be paid to each claimant.
(C) The director shall encumber the balance of the appropriation,
or moneys sufficient to pay the approved claims, whichever is the
lesser.
2. Each claimant must submit a statement of total damages sustained per
occurrence. For each such statement, the following conditions and re-
quirements apply:
(A) The amount of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) must be de-
ducted from each such statement. This deductible is a net loss to
the owner or lessee, and will not be compensated for from the ex-
pendable big game depredation fund.
(B) The total amount of all claims for damages to forage that may
be paid from the expendable big game depredation fund shall not ex-
ceed fifty percent (50%) of the amount of interest earned from in-
vestments of moneys in that fund in any one (1) fiscal year.


3. Each approved claim must contain a certification by the director of
the department of fish and game, or his designee, that:
(A) All statutory requirements leading up to approval for payment
have been met.
(B) The claimant has certified that he will accept the amount ap-
proved as payment in full for the claim submitted, subject to the
conditions and requirements of this subsection.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.